Maryland, session 2026, HB0389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–16.
[(a) The official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult
offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court or the intake officer
immediately when a person, who is or appears to be under the age of 18 years, is received
at the facility and shall deliver him to the court upon request or transfer him to the facility
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0389*

HOUSE BILL 389
designated by the intake officer or the court, unless the court has waived its jurisdiction
with respect to the person and he is being proceeded against as an adult.
(b) When a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution, the child
shall promptly be transferred to the appropriate officer or adult detention facility in
accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime.]
(A) A CHILD, INCLUDING ONE SUBJECT TO ADULT CRIMINAL COURT
JURISDICTION, WHO HAS BEEN ARRESTED, HAS BEEN CONVICTED, OR IS AWAITING
TRIAL ON CRIMINAL CHARGES MAY NOT BE DETAINED OR CONFINED IN ANY
INSTITUTION IN WHICH THE CHILD HAS CONTACT WITH OR COMES WITHIN SIGHT OR
SOUND OF AN INCARCERATED ADULT.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A CHILD
WHO HAS BEEN ARRESTED, HAS BEEN CONVICTED, OR IS AWAITING TRIAL FOR AN
OFFENSE UNDER ADULT CRIMINAL COURT JURISDICTION MAY NOT BE HELD IN
CUSTODY IN AN ADULT CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(C) A CHILD MAY BE TEMPORARILY HELD FOR PROCESSING IN AN ADULT
JAIL OR A CORRECTIONAL OR DETENTION FACILITY THAT DOES NOT HAVE A SECURE
JUVENILE DETENTION AREA IF THE CHILD IS:
(1) SEPARATED BY SIGHT AND SOUND FROM INCARCERATED ADULTS;
AND
(2) HELD FOR A PERIOD NOT EXCEEDING 6 HOURS, INCLUDING TIME
IN THE FACILITY AND IN TRANSPORT TO THE NEAREST JUVENILE FACILITY.
[(c)] (D) A child may not be transported together with adults who have been
charged with or convicted of a crime [unless the court has waived its jurisdiction and the
child is being proceeded against as an adult].
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–202.
(h) [(1)] Pending a determination under this section to transfer its jurisdiction,
the court shall order the child to be held in a secure juvenile facility unless[:
(i)] the child is released on bail, recognizance, or other conditions of
pretrial release[;
(ii) there is not available capacity in a secure juvenile facility, as
determined by the Department of Juvenile Services; or

HOUSE BILL 389 3
(iii) the court finds that detention in a secure juvenile facility would
pose a risk of harm to the child or others.
(2) If the court makes a finding under paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection
that detention in a secure juvenile facility would pose a risk of harm to the child or others,
the court shall state the reasons for the finding on the record].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2028.